zh-TW: 板球球道墊覆蓋長度: 自訂長度; 完整投手丘; 半個投手丘; 其他
hr-HR: Duljina pokrivenosti terena: Prilagođena duljina; Cijeli teren; Pola terena; Ostalo
cs: Délka pokrytí hrací plochy: Vlastní délka; Celé hřiště; Polovina hřiště; Ostatní
vi: Chiều dài phạm vi phủ của tấm bạt sân cỏ: Độ dài tùy chỉnh; Cả sân; Nửa sân; Khác
pt-PT: comprimento da cobertura do tapete de campo: Comprimento personalizado; Relvado completo; Meio relvado; Outro
en: Pitch mat coverage length: Custom length; Full pitch; Half pitch; Other
it: Lunghezza di copertura del tappeto del campo da cricket: Lunghezza personalizzata; Campo intero; Metà campo; Altro
sl-SI: Dolžina pokritosti metalne podlage: Dolžina po meri; Polna dolžina igrišča; Polovična dolžina igrišča; Drugo
hu: Dobószőnyeg fedési hossza: Egyedi hossz; Teljes pálya; Fél pálya; Egyéb
pl: Długość pokrycia maty pitch: Niestandardowa długość; Pełne boisko; Połowa boiska; Inna
ko: 피치 매트 커버리지 길이: 맞춤 길이; 풀 피치; 하프 피치; 기타
fi: Krikettikentän maton peittoalueen pituus: Mukautettu pituus; Koko kenttä; Puolikas kenttä; Muu
de: Abdeckungslänge der Cricket-Pitchmatte: Benutzerdefinierte Länge; Ganzes Spielfeld; Halbes Spielfeld; Andere
tr: Pitch mat kapsama uzunluğu: Özel uzunluk; Tam saha; Yarım saha; Diğer
pt-BR: Tapete da área de arremesso comprimento de cobertura: Comprimento personalizado; Pitch completo; Meio pitch; Outros
ja: ピッチマットのカバー範囲の長さ: カスタム長; フルピッチ; ハーフピッチ; その他
bg-BG: Дължина на покритието на тренировъчната постелка за хвърляне: Дължина по поръчка; Пълна дължина на игрището; Половин дължина на игрището; Друго
da: Dækningslængde for banemåtten: Tilpasset længde; Hel bane; Halv bane; Andet
ro-RO: Lungimea de acoperire a saltelei de lansare: Lungime personalizată; Teren complet; Jumătate de teren; Altele
lt-LT: Kriketo aikštelės kilimėlio dengimo ilgis: Pasirinktinis ilgis; Visa aikštelė; Pusė aikštelės; Kita
th: ความยาวการครอบคลุมของเสื่อปูพื้นสนาม: ความยาวที่กำหนดเอง; เต็มพิตช์; ครึ่งพิตช์; อื่นๆ
sv: Täckningslängd för planmattan: Anpassad längd; Helplan; Halvplan; Övrigt
nb: Lengde på dekningsområdet for banematten: Egendefinert lengde; Hel pitch; Halv pitch; Annet
es: Longitud de cobertura de la alfombra de juego: Longitud personalizada; Pista completa; Media pista; Otra
zh-CN: 板球场地垫覆盖长度: 自定义长度; 全场; 半场; 其他
sk-SK: Dĺžka pokrytia nadhadzovacej podložky: Vlastná dĺžka; Celé ihrisko; Polovica ihriska; Iné
fr: Longueur couverte par le tapis de cricket: Longueur personnalisée; Terrain complet; Demi-terrain; Autre
el: Μήκος επιφάνειας κάλυψης του στρώματος προσγείωσης: Προσαρμοσμένο μήκος; Ολόκληρο γήπεδο; Μισό γήπεδο; Άλλο
ru: Длина покрытия питч-коврика: Нестандартная длина; Полное поле; Половина поля; Другое
nl: Pitchingmat dekkingslengte: Aangepaste lengte; Volledige pitch; Halve pitch; Overig